Utah statutes.
67-4a-103.   General rules for taking custody of intangible unclaimed
property.
(1)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or by other statute, the state
of Utah may take custody of intangible property if the property is considered
abandoned according to the standards established in Part 2 and:
(a)  the last-known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the
apparent owner is in Utah;
(b)  the records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person
entitled to the property and it is established that the last-known address of
the person entitled to the property is in Utah;
(c)  the records of the holder do not reflect the last-known address of the
apparent owner and it is established that:
(i)  the last-known address of the person entitled to the property is in Utah;
or
(ii)  the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision
or agency of Utah and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the
state of the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled
to the property;
(d)  the last-known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of
the holder, is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or
custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is
not applicable to the property and the holder is a domiciliary or a government
or governmental subdivision or agency of Utah;
(e)  the last-known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of
the holder, is in a foreign nation and the holder is a domiciliary or a
government or governmental subdivision or agency of Utah; or
(f)  the transaction out of which the property arose occurred in Utah and:
(i)  the holder is domiciled in a state that does not provide by law for the
escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed
property law is not applicable to the property; and
(ii)  the last-known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to
the property is:
(A)  unknown; or
(B)  in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial
taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not
applicable to the property.
(2)  The expiration, before or after the effective date of this chapter, of
any period of time specified by contract, statute, or court order, during
which a claim for money or property can be made or during which an action or
proceeding may be commenced or enforced to obtain payment of a claim for money
or to recover property, does not prevent the money or property from being
considered abandoned or affect any duty to file a report or to pay or deliver
abandoned property to the administrator as required by this chapter.
